Georgia, session 2025_26, HB747.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act creating the State Court of Cobb County, approved March 26, 1964 (Ga. L. 1964, p.
3211), as amended, is amended in Section 3 of Part 1 by replacing:
"The chief judge of the State Court of Cobb County shall receive as additional
compensation $10,892.55 per annum."
with:
"The chief judge of the State Court of Cobb County shall receive as additional
compensation $11,328.25 per annum."
SECTION 2.
Said Act is further amended in Section 23 of Part 1 by replacing:
H. B. 747
- 1 -

LC 47 3506/AP
"The salary of the judges of Division 1 of the State Court of Cobb County shall
be $208,782.88 per annum."
with:
"The salary of the judges of Division 1 of the State Court of Cobb County shall
be $217,134.20 per annum."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 747
- 2 -